Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Article 3. Apprehension and Restraint.

§ 33-13-17.
Apprehension.

Apprehension is the taking of a person into custody.

Any commissioned officer, warrant officer, noncommissioned officer or military policeman when in the execution of his guard or police duties, any marshal of a court-martial appointed pursuant to the provisions of this code, any peace officer having authority to apprehend offenders under the laws of the United States or of this state, or any other person charged with law enforcement functions who is designated by the Adjutant General of the State of Mississippi, is authorized to apprehend persons subject to this code upon reasonable belief that an offense has been committed and that the person apprehended committed it.

Commissioned officers, warrant officers and noncommissioned officers have authority to quell quarrels, frays and disorders among persons subject to this code and to apprehend persons subject to this code who take part therein.

HISTORY:
Former §33-13-51 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-07; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 7] repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 102, eff from and after July 1, 1981, amended and recodified as §33-13-17 by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-19.
Apprehension of deserters.

Any civil officer or peace officer having authority to apprehend offenders under the laws of the United States or of a state, territory, commonwealth or possession, or the District of Columbia, may summarily apprehend a deserter from the state military forces.

HISTORY:
Former §33-13-53 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-08; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 8] repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 102, eff from and after July 1, 1981, amended and recodified as §33-13-19 by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-21.
Imposition of restraint.

Arrest is the restraint of a person by an order, not imposed as a punishment for an offense, directing him to remain within specified limits. Confinement is the physical restraint of a person.

An enlisted member may be ordered into arrest or confinement by any commissioned officer by an order, oral or written, delivered in person or through other persons subject to this code or through any person authorized by this code to apprehend persons. A commanding officer may authorize warrant officers, or noncommissioned officers to order enlisted members of his company or subject to his authority into arrest or confinement.

A commissioned officer or warrant officer may be ordered into arrest or confinement only by a commanding officer to whose authority he is subject, by an order, oral or written, delivered in person or by another commissioned officer. The authority to order such persons into arrest or confinement may not be delegated.

No person may be ordered into arrest or confinement except for probable cause.

This section does not limit the authority of persons authorized to apprehend offenders to secure the custody of an alleged offender until a proper authority may be notified.

HISTORY:
Former §33-13-55 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-09; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 9] repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 102, eff from and after July 1, 1981, amended and recodified as §33-13-21 by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-23.
Restraint of persons charged with offenses; confinement in civilian institutions.

Any person subject to this code charged with an offense under this code shall be ordered into arrest or confinement as circumstances may require; but when charged with only an offense normally tried by a summary court-martial, such person shall not ordinarily be placed in confinement unless a threat to himself or others. When any person subject to this code is placed in arrest or confinement prior to trial, immediate steps shall be taken to inform him of the specific wrong of which he is accused and to try him or to dismiss the charges and release him. Persons confined other than in a guardhouse, whether before, during or after trial by a military court, shall be confined in civil institutions designated by the Adjutant General.

HISTORY:
Former §33-13-57 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-10; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 10] and §33-13-59 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-11; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 11] repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 102, eff from and after July 1, 1981, amended and recodified as §33-13-23 by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-25.
Reports and receiving of prisoners.

No provost marshal, commander of a guard, master-at-arms, warden, keeper, or officer of a municipal or county jail or any other jail, designated under Section 33-13-23, may refuse to receive or keep any prisoner committed to his charge, when the committing person furnishes a statement, signed by him, of the offense charged against the prisoner.

Every commander of a guard, master-at-arms, warden, keeper or officer of a municipal or county jail or of any other jail, designated under Section 33-13-23, to whose charge a prisoner is committed shall, within twenty-four (24) hours after that commitment or as soon as he is relieved from guard, report to the commanding officer of the prisoner or the Adjutant General the name of the prisoner, the offense charged against him, and the name of the person who ordered or authorized the commitment, and such report shall be entered on the jail docket.

HISTORY:
Former §33-13-61 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-12; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 12] repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 102, eff from and after July 1, 1981, amended and recodified as §33-13-25 by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-27.
Punishment prohibited before trial.

Subject to Section 33-13-355, no person, while being held for trial or the result of trial, may be subjected to punishment or penalty other than arrest or confinement upon the charges pending against him, nor shall the arrest or confinement imposed upon him be any more rigorous than the circumstances require to insure his presence, but he may be subjected to minor punishment during that period for infractions of discipline.

HISTORY:
Former §33-13-63 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-13; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 13] repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 102, eff from and after July 1, 1981, amended and recodified as §33-13-27 by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 15, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-29.
Delivery of offenders to civil authorities.

Under such regulations as may be prescribed under this code, a person subject to this code who is on active duty who is accused of an offense against civil authority shall be delivered, upon request, to the civil authority for trial.

When delivery under this section is made to any civil authority of a person undergoing sentence of a court-martial, the delivery, if followed by conviction in a civil tribunal, interrupts the execution of the sentence of the court-martial; and the offender, after having answered to the civil authorities for his offense, shall, upon the request of competent military authority, be returned to military custody for the completion of his sentence.

HISTORY:
Former §33-13-65 [Codes, 1942, § 8529-14; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 14] repealed by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 102, eff from and after July 1, 1981, amended and recodified as §33-13-29 by Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 16, eff from and after July 1, 1981.